Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 23. Wyoming Cultural Trust Fund

§ 9-2-2301.
Short title.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Cultural Trust Fund Act.”

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 79, § 1.

§ 9-2-2302.
Legislative declaration.

The legislature hereby finds that Wyoming and its people possess a unique cultural heritage. The legislature further finds that there is a need to preserve, promote and enhance that unique cultural heritage for the citizens of the state and the nation and for future generations to understand and appreciate the heritage that makes Wyoming unique among the United States.

It is the purpose of this article to promote, preserve and enhance Wyoming’s unique cultural heritage by creating a Wyoming cultural trust fund administered by a trust fund board to coordinate public and private donations and manage the distribution of the investment earnings from the Wyoming cultural trust fund.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 79, § 1.

§ 9-2-2303.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Board” means the Wyoming cultural trust fund board established by W.S.

9-2-2305

;

“Division” means the division of cultural resources within the department of state parks and cultural resources, or its successor;

“Trust fund” means the Wyoming cultural trust fund created by W.S.

9-2-2304

.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 79, § 1; 1999, ch. 69, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-2-2304.
Wyoming cultural trust fund established; corpus inviolate; investment by state treasurer.

The Wyoming cultural trust fund is created. The Wyoming cultural trust fund shall consist of those funds designated to the fund by law and all monies collected from federal grants and other contributions, grants, gifts, bequests and donations to the cultural trust fund.

The monies deposited into the Wyoming cultural resources trust fund established pursuant to this section are inviolate and constitute a permanent or perpetual trust fund. The monies shall be transmitted to the state treasurer for credit to the trust fund and shall be invested by the state treasurer as authorized by law and in a manner to obtain the highest net return possible consistent with the preservation of the corpus. Any earnings from investment of the corpus of the trust fund shall be credited by the state treasurer into a separate account and distributed in accordance with W.S.

9-2-2307

.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 79, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2008, ch. 113, § 2; 2021 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005,in (a), rewrote the first sentence, deleting reference to the trust and agency fund, and substituted “fund” for “account”; and deleted reference to the trust and agency fund in (b).

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d) and (e)” for “W.S.

9-4-711

” in (b).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in the second sentence of (b), substituted "by law and" for "under W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d) and (e)," added "net" following "highest," and substituted "earnings" for "interest earned" in the third sentence.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-2-2305.
Wyoming cultural trust fund board; creation; members.

There is created the Wyoming cultural trust fund board. The board shall consist of six (6) members, as follows:

The administrator of the division of cultural resources or his designee who shall serve as an ex officio member of the board, without a vote; and

Five (5) persons who are residents of Wyoming, appointed by the governor and confirmed by the senate. Board membership shall reflect a broad spectrum of experiences, including, but not limited to, the arts, history, archaeology, humanities and cultural and heritage tourism and shall be selected from the following nominees:

One (1) person nominated by the Wyoming commission on parks and cultural resources;

Two (2) persons nominated by the Wyoming arts council board; and

Two (2) persons nominated by the Wyoming national register review board.

Except for the initial board, each appointed member of the board shall serve for a term of three (3) years. Of the initial appointees, one (1) member shall be appointed for one (1) year, two (2) members shall be appointed for two (2) years and two (2) members shall be appointed for three (3) years. The governor may remove any member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. A vacancy on the board shall be filled for the balance of the unexpired term. The board shall select one (1) of its members to serve as chairman.

The board shall meet regularly. Members shall serve without compensation but shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred in the performance of their duties in the manner and amounts provided by law for state employees.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 79, § 1; 2009, ch. 101, § 1; 2014 ch. 37, § 1, effective March 1, 2015.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(ii)(B) added “board” following “council.”

The 2014 amendment,

effective March 1, 2015, in the introductory paragraph of (a), substituted “six (6)” for “five (5)”; in (a)(i), inserted “who shall serve as an ex officio member of the board, without a vote”; in introductory paragraph of (a)(ii), substituted “Five (5)” for “Four (4),” inserted “who are residents of Wyoming,” inserted “Board membership shall reflect a broad spectrum of experiences, including, but not limited to, the arts, history, archaeology, humanities and cultural and heritage tourism and shall be selected”; in (a)(ii)(A), substituted “One (1) person” for “Two (2) persons”; added (a)(ii)(C); and made stylistic changes.

§ 9-2-2306.
Wyoming cultural trust fund board; duties and responsibilities.

The board shall:

Initiate innovative program planning;

Review innovative program grants and grant proposals;

Establish criteria for grant categories and grant applications through rules and regulations;

Require local matching funds or other in-kind contributions from grantees;

Review and monitor the expenditure of monies from the trust fund to grantees; and

Consider other necessary matters.

In fulfilling its duties under subsection (a) of this section, the board may:

Consult with the Wyoming arts council and the Wyoming parks and cultural resources commission as necessary;

Accept federal grants and other contributions, grants, gifts, bequests and donations from any source.

The board shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of W.S.

9-2-2301

through

9-2-2308

.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 79, § 1.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

§ 9-2-2307.
Disbursement of grants from trust fund investment earnings.

Subject to approval of applications from nonprofit and governmental cultural, historical and arts organizations, the board may award grants to promote, preserve and enhance the unique cultural heritage of Wyoming and its people.

The board shall have the discretion in determining the amount of money under each grant, except that no grant shall be awarded until:

The corpus of the trust fund equals four million dollars ($4,000,000.00) or July 1, 2000, whichever occurs earlier; and

The interest earned from the corpus of the fund and available for disbursement is sufficient to adequately fund a project, taking into consideration all other monies or in-kind contributions provided as a match for the project by the grantee.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 79, § 1.

§ 9-2-2308.
Biennial audit; report by board.

The director of the department of audit or his designee shall audit the trust fund created by W.S.

9-2-2304

biennially.

The board shall annually report to the governor, the joint appropriations interim committee and the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources interim committee no later than October 1 with respect to all:

Federal grants, state appropriations and other contributions, grants, gifts, bequests and donations received and credited to the Wyoming cultural trust fund during the preceding fiscal year; and

Grants awarded by the board to nonprofit and governmental cultural, historical and arts organizations.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 79, § 1; 1999, ch. 150, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 1.

The 2008 amendment

deleted the former second sentence of (a), which read: “Copies of the audit shall be provided to the governor and the joint travel, recreation, wildlife and cultural resources interim committee.”

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”